California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 depreciation, and general administrative expenses. The amount identified for indirect costs shall be calculated as the average projected cost for these expenses in an economically and efficiently operated community care facility.

(5) “Property costs” include mortgages, leases, rent, taxes, capital or leasehold improvements, depreciation, and other expenses related to the physical structure. The amount identified for property costs shall be based on the fair rental value of a model facility that is adequately designed, constructed, and maintained to meet the needs of persons with developmental disabilities. The amount identified for property costs shall be calculated as the average projected fair rental value of an economically and efficiently operated community care facility.

(b) The cost model shall take into account factors that include, but are not limited to, all of the
 following:

(1) Facility size, as defined by the department on the basis of the number of facility beds licensed by the State Department of Social Services and vendorized by the regional center.

(2) Specific geographic areas, as defined by the department on the basis of cost of living and other pertinent economic indicators.

(3) Common levels of direct care, as defined by the department on the basis of services specific to an identifiable group of persons as determined through the individual program plan.

(4) Positive outcomes, as defined by the department on the basis of increased integration, independence, and productivity at the aggregate facility and individual consumer level.

(5) Owner-operated and staff-operated reimbursement, which shall not differ for facilities that are required to comply with the same program requirements.

(c) The rates established for individual community care facilities serving persons with developmental disabilities shall reflect all of the model cost elements and rate development factors described in this section. The cost model design shall include a process for updating the cost model elements that address variables, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Economic trends in California.

(2) New state or federal program requirements.

(3) Changes in the state or federal minimum wage.

(4) Increases in fees,
 taxes, or other business costs.

(5) Increases in federal supplemental security income/state supplementary program for the aged, blind, and disabled payments.

(d) Rates established for persons with developmental disabilities who are also dually diagnosed with a mental health disorder may be fixed at a higher rate. The department shall work with the State Department of Health Care Services to establish criteria upon which higher rates may be fixed pursuant to this subdivision. The higher rate for persons with developmental disabilities who are also dually diagnosed with a mental health disorder may be paid when requested by the director of the regional center and approved by the Director of Developmental Services.

(e) By January 1, 2001, the department shall prepare proposed regulations to implement the changes
 outlined in this section. The department may use a private firm to assist in the development of these changes and shall confer with consumers, providers, and other interested parties concerning the proposed regulations. By May 15, 2001, and each year thereafter, the department shall provide the Legislature with annual community care facility rates, including any draft amendments to the regulations as required. By July 1, 2001, and each year thereafter, contingent upon an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the department shall adopt emergency regulations that establish the annual rates for community care facilities serving persons with developmental disabilities for each fiscal year.

(f) During the first year of operation under the revised rate model, individual facilities shall be held harmless for any reduction in aggregate facility payments caused solely by the change in reimbursement
 methodology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 83.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4681.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 1996–97 fiscal year, the rate schedule authorized by the department in operation June 30, 1996, shall be increased based upon the amount appropriated in the Budget Act of 1996 for that purpose. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 1997–98 fiscal year, the rate schedule authorized by the department in operation on June 30, 1997, shall be increased based upon the amount appropriated in the Budget Act of 1997 for that purpose. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 1998–99 fiscal year, the rate schedule authorized by the department in operation on June 30, 1998, shall be increased commencing July 1, 1998, based upon the amount appropriated in the Budget Act of 1998 for that purpose. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 1998–99 fiscal year, the rate schedule authorized by the department in operation on December 31, 1998, shall be increased January 1, 1999, based upon the cost-of-living adjustments in the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Program for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled appropriated in the Budget Act of 1998 for that purpose. The increase shall be applied as a percentage and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 1999–2000 fiscal year, the rate schedule authorized by the department in operation on June 30, 1999, shall be increased July 1, 1999, based upon the amount appropriated in the Budget Act of 1999 for that purpose. The increase shall be applied as a percentage and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(f) In addition, commencing January 1, 2000, any funds available from cost-of-living adjustments in the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment (SSI/SSP) for the 1999–2000 fiscal year shall be used to further increase the community care facility rate. The increase shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, for the 2006–07 fiscal year, the rate schedule in effect on June 30, 2006, shall be increased on July 1, 2006, by 3 percent, subject to funds specifically appropriated for this increase in the Budget Act of 2006. The increase shall be applied as a percentage and the percentage shall be the same for all providers. Any subsequent increase shall be governed by Sections 4681.5 and 4681.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 5.   Effective February 16, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4681.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 1998–99 fiscal year, the rate schedule increased pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 4681.3 shall be increased by an additional amount on January 1, 1999, based upon the amount appropriated in the Budget Act of 1998 for that purpose. The rate increase permitted by this section shall be applied as a percentage, and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, for the 1999–2000 fiscal year, the rate schedule authorized by the department in operation on December 31, 1999, shall be increased on January 1, 2000, based upon the amount appropriated in the Budget Act of 1999 for that purpose. The rate increase permitted by this section shall be applied as a percentage and the percentage shall be the same for all providers.

(c) In order to help reduce direct care staff turnover and improve overall quality of care in Alternative Residential Model (ARM) facilities, funds appropriated by the Budget Act of 1998 and the Budget Act of 1999 to increase facility rates effective January 1, 1999, excluding any additional funds appropriated due to increases in benefits under Article 5 (commencing with Section 12200) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9, and January 1, 2000, respectively, shall be used only for any of the following:

(1) Increasing direct care staff salaries, wages, and benefits.

(2) Providing coverage while direct care staff are in training classes or taking a training or competency test pursuant to Section 4681.5.

(3) Other purposes approved by the director.

(d) ARM providers shall report to regional centers, in a format and frequency determined by the department, information necessary for the department to determine, through the regional center, compliance with subdivision (c), including, but not limited to, direct care staff salaries, wages, benefits, and staff turnover.

(e) The department shall adopt emergency regulations in order to implement this section, which shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) A process for enforcing the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d).

(2) Consequences to an ARM provider for failing to comply with the requirements of subdivisions (c) and (d), including a process for obtaining approval from the director for the expenditure of funds for other purposes, as permitted by paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(3) A process for adjudicating provider appeals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 310, Sec. 39.   Effective August 19, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4681.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a regional center shall not approve a service level for a residential service provider, as defined in Section 56002 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, if the approval would result in an increase in state costs or the rate to be paid to the provider that is greater than the rate that is in effect on June 30, 2008, or, for residential service providers subject to subdivision (b), unless the regional center demonstrates to the department that the approval is necessary to protect the consumer’s health or safety and the department has granted prior written authorization.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law
 or regulation, the department shall, effective July 1, 2016, establish a rate schedule for residential community care facilities vendored to provide services to a maximum of four persons with developmental disabilities.

(c) Community care facilities with rates established pursuant to subdivision (b) are subject to the regulatory requirements contained in Subchapter 4 (commencing with Section 56001) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(d) Rate changes made as a result of implementing the rate schedule established pursuant to subdivision (b) for community care facilities vendored to provide services to a maximum of four persons with developmental disabilities are not subject to the restrictions of subdivision (a) if the approved service level is not higher than the service level in effect at the time of the change.

(e) No later than February 1, 2017, regional centers shall report to the department on the number of residential community care facilities with rates established pursuant to subdivision (b). The report shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) The number of facilities vendored since July 1, 2016, by service level and vendored capacity.

(2) The number of facilities vendored prior to July 1, 2016, that have subsequently been approved for a new rate, by service level, vendored capacity, and prior vendored capacity, if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 26, Sec. 10.   (AB 1606)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4681.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, commencing July 1, 2008:

(1) A regional center shall not pay an existing residential service provider, for services where rates are determined through a negotiation between the regional center and the provider, a rate higher than the rate in effect on June 30, 2008, unless the increase is required by a contract between the regional center and the vendor that is in effect on June 30, 2008, or the regional center demonstrates that the approval is necessary to protect the consumer’s health or safety and the department has granted prior written authorization.

(2) A regional center shall not negotiate a rate with a
 new residential service provider, for services where rates are determined through a negotiation between the regional center and the provider, that is higher than the regional center’s median rate for the same service code and unit of service, or the statewide median rate for the same service code and unit of service, whichever is lower. The unit of service designation shall conform with an existing regional center designation or, if none exists, a designation used to calculate the statewide median rate for the same service. The regional center shall annually certify to the department its median rate for each negotiated rate service code, by designated unit of service. This certification shall be subject to verification through the department’s biennial fiscal audit of the regional center.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing January 1, 2017, regional centers may negotiate a rate adjustment with residential service providers regarding
 rates that are otherwise restricted pursuant to subdivision (a), if the adjustment is necessary in order to pay employees no less than the minimum wage as established by Section 1182.12 of the Labor Code, as amended by Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2016, and only for the purpose of adjusting payroll costs associated with the minimum wage increase. The rate adjustment shall be specific to the unit of service designation that is affected by the increased minimum wage, shall be specific to payroll costs associated with any increase necessary to adjust employee pay only to the extent necessary to bring pay into compliance with the increased state minimum wage, and shall not be used as a general wage enhancement for employees paid above the minimum wage. Regional centers shall maintain documentation on the process to determine, and the rationale for granting, any rate adjustment associated with the minimum wage increase.

(c) Notwithstanding
 subdivision (a), commencing July 1, 2015, regional centers may negotiate a rate adjustment with residential service providers regarding rates that are otherwise restricted pursuant to subdivision (a), if the adjustment is necessary to implement Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 245) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, as added by Chapter 317 of the Statutes of 2014. The rate adjustment may be applied only if a minimum of 24 hours or three days of paid sick leave per year was not a benefit provided to employees as of June 30, 2015, and shall be specific to payroll costs associated with any increase necessary to compensate an employee up to a maximum of 24 hours or three days of paid sick leave in each year of employment.

(d) For purposes of this section, “residential service provider” includes Adult Residential Facilities for Persons with Special Health Care Needs, as described in Section 4684.50.

(e) This section shall not apply to those services for which rates are determined by the State Department of Health Care Services, or the State Department of Developmental Services, or are usual and customary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 26, Sec. 11.   (AB 1606)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4681.7.

(a) Effective July 1, 2011, in order to maintain a consumer’s preferred living arrangement and adjust the residential services and supports in accordance with changing service needs identified in the individual program plan (IPP), a regional center may enter into a signed written agreement with a residential service provider for a consumer’s supervision, training, and support needs to be provided at a lower level of payment than the facility’s designated Alternative Residential Model (ARM) service level. The regional center signed written agreement with the provider shall ensure all of the following:

(1) Services provided to other facility residents comply with the applicable service requirements for
 the facility’s approved service level pursuant to Section 4681.1 and Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) Protection of the health and safety of each facility resident.

(3) Identification of the revised services and supports to be provided to the consumer within the ARM rate structure as part of the establishment or revision of an IPP.

(4) Identification of the rate.

(b) If the service needs of a consumer referred to in subdivision (a) change such that the consumer requires a higher level of supervision, training, and support, the regional center shall adjust the consumer’s service level and rate to meet the consumer’s changing needs.

(c) A regional center is authorized to
 enter into a signed written agreement with a residential service provider for a consumer’s needed services at a lower level of payment and staffing without adjusting the facility’s approved service level. A signed written agreement for a lower level of payment and staffing may only be entered into when a regional center, a consumer, and the facility agree that the facility can safely provide the service and supports needed by the consumer, as identified in the IPP, at the lower level of payment.

(d) Any negotiated lower level of payment pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the payment options within the ARM rate structure and with associated ARM service level requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 37, Sec. 14.   (AB 104)   Effective June 30, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

4682.

Under no circumstances shall the rate of state payment to any provider of out-of-home care exceed the average amount charged to private clients residing in the same facility, nor shall the monthly rate of state payment to any such facility, with the exception of a licensed acute care or emergency hospital, exceed the average monthly cost of services for all persons with developmental disabilities who reside in state hospitals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4683.

It is the intent of the Legislature that rates of payment for out-of-home care shall be established in such ways as to assure the maximum utilization of all federal and other sources of funding, to which persons with developmental disabilities are legally entitled, prior to the commitment of state funds for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the cost of providing 24-hour out-of-home nonmedical care and supervision in community care facilities licensed or approved pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code shall be funded by the Aid to Families with Dependent Children-Foster Care (AFDC-FC) program pursuant to Section 11464, for children who are both AFDC-FC recipients and regional center consumers.

(b) The cost of providing adoption assistance benefits shall be funded by the Adoption Assistance Program (AAP) under Section 16121, for children who are both AAP recipients and regional center consumers.

(c) (1) For regional center
 consumers who are recipients of AFDC-FC benefits, regional centers shall purchase or secure the services that are contained in the child’s Individualized Family Service Plan (IFSP) or Individual Program Plan (IPP) but that are not allowable under federal or state AFDC-FC provisions.

(2) For regional center consumers who are recipients of AAP benefits, regional centers shall purchase or secure the services that are contained in the child’s IFSP or IPP.

(3) For regional center consumers receiving services under paragraph (1) or (2), these services shall be separately purchased or secured by the regional center, pursuant to Sections 4646 to 4648, inclusive, Section 4685, and Sections 95018 and 95020 of the Government Code.

(4) Regional centers shall accept referrals for evaluations of AFDC-FC-eligible children and
 children receiving AAP benefits for the purpose of determining eligibility for regional center services, pursuant to Section 4642. Regional centers shall assist county welfare and probation departments in identifying appropriate placement resources for children who are recipients of AFDC-FC and who are eligible for regional center services.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, children who are recipients of AFDC-FC and regional center services shall not be prohibited from receiving in-home respite services, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4690.2, if they are residing with any of the following:

(A) A relative, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 319, or, in the case of an Indian child, an extended family member, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 224.1.

(B) A nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7.

(C) A resource family, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 16519.5.

(D) A
 tribally approved home, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 224.1.

(E) A foster family home, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, that is not vendored by the regional center as a residential facility.

(F) A small family home, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, that is not vendored by the regional center as a residential facility. Regional centers shall assess a small family home for service need, including verification of the small family home’s staffing level, through the individual program plan (IPP) process pursuant to Sections 4646 and 4648 or the individualized family service plan (IFSP) process pursuant to Sections 95018 and 95020 of the Government Code, as applicable, prior to approving in-home respite services for children residing in a licensed small
 family home. 

(2) AFDC-FC and AAP benefits shall be for care and supervision, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 11460, and the regional centers shall separately purchase or secure other services contained in the child’s IFSP or IPP pursuant to Section 4646 to 4648, inclusive, Section 4685, and Sections 95018 and 95020 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, the receipt of AFDC-FC or AAP benefits shall not be cause to deny any other services that a child or family for which the child or family is otherwise eligible pursuant to this division.

(e) This section shall apply to all recipients of AFDC-FC and AAP benefits, including those with rates established prior to the effective date of the act that adds this subdivision, pursuant to Sections 11464 and 16121.

(f) For purposes of this section, the terms “child” and “children” include a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400. The Legislature finds and declares that this subdivision is declarative of, and clarifies, existing law.

(g) Regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this section shall be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of these
 regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 909, Sec. 1.   (SB 1197)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Adult Residential Facilities for Persons with Special Health Care Needs and Group Homes for Children with Special Health Care Needs [4684.50. - 4684.77.]

4684.50.

(a) (1) “Adult Residential Facility for Persons with Special Health Care Needs (ARFPSHN)” means any adult residential facility that provides 24-hour health care and intensive support services in a homelike setting that is licensed to serve up to five adults with developmental disabilities as defined in Section 4512.

(2) “Group Home for Children with Special Health Care Needs (GHCSHN)” means a group home, as described in paragraph (22) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code and licensed pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 1567.50) of the Health and Safety Code, that provides 24-hour health care and intensive support services in a homelike setting that is licensed to serve up to five children or nonminor
 dependents with developmental disabilities as defined in Section 4512.

(3) For purposes of this article, an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN may only be established in a facility approved pursuant to Section 4688.5 or through an approved regional center community placement plan pursuant to former Section 4418.25, as that section read on June 30, 2026, or an approved regional center community resource development plan pursuant to Section 4418.25.

(b) “Consultant” means a person professionally qualified by training and experience to give expert advice, information, training, or to provide
 health-related assessments and interventions specified in a consumer’s individual health care plan.

(c) “Direct care personnel” means all personnel who directly provide program or nursing services to consumers. Administrative and licensed personnel shall be considered direct care personnel when directly providing program or nursing services to clients. Consultants shall not be considered direct care personnel.

(d) “Individual health care plan” means the plan that identifies and documents the health care and intensive support service needs of a consumer.

(e) “Individual health care plan team” means those individuals who develop, monitor, and revise the individual health care plan for consumers residing in an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN.

(1) For an ARFPSHN or a
 GHCSHN, the team shall, at a minimum, be composed of all of the following individuals:

(A) Regional center service coordinator and other regional center representative, as necessary.

(B) Consumer, and, if appropriate, the consumer’s parents, legal guardian or conservator, or authorized representative.

(C) Consumer’s primary care physician, or other physician as designated by the regional center.

(D) ARFPSHN or GHCSHN administrator.

(E) ARFPSHN or GHCSHN registered nurse.

(F) Others deemed necessary for developing a comprehensive and effective plan.

(2) For a
 GHCSHN, in addition to the individuals listed in paragraph (1), the team shall, at a minimum, include all of the individuals required for an individualized health care team as described in subdivision (d) of Section 17710.

(f) “Intensive support needs” means the consumer requires physical assistance in performing four or more of the following activities of daily living:

(1) Eating.

(2) Dressing.

(3) Bathing.

(4) Transferring.

(5) Toileting.

(6) Continence.

(g) “Special health care needs” for an
 ARFPSHN means the consumer has health conditions that are predictable and stable, as determined by the individual health care plan team, and for which the individual requires nursing supports for any of the following types of care:

(1) Nutrition support, including total parenteral feeding and gastrostomy feeding, and hydration.

(2) Cardiorespiratory monitoring.

(3) Oxygen support, including continuous positive airway pressure and bilevel positive airway pressure, and use of other inhalation-assistive devices.

(4) Nursing interventions for tracheostomy care and suctioning.

(5) Nursing interventions for colostomy, ileostomy, or other medical or surgical procedures.

(6) Special medication regimes including injection and intravenous medications.

(7) Management of insulin-dependent diabetes.

(8) Bowel care management, including enemas or suppositories.

(9) Indwelling urinary catheter/catheter procedure.

(10) Treatment for antimicrobial resistant infections.

(11) Treatment for wounds or pressure injuries.

(12) Postoperative care and rehabilitation.

(13) Pain management and palliative care.

(14) Renal
 dialysis.

(h) “Special health care needs” for a GHCSHN means a predictable and stable condition, as determined by the individual health care plan team, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), that can rapidly deteriorate, resulting in permanent injury or death, or that requires specialized in-home health care, as described in subdivisions (a) and (g) of Section 17710.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 10.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.53.

(a) The State Department of Developmental Services and the State Department of Social Services shall jointly implement a licensing program to provide special health care and intensive support services to adults, and a licensing program to provide special health care and intensive support services to children, in homelike community settings.

(b) The programs shall be implemented through approved community placement plans pursuant to former Section 4418.25, as that section read on June 30, 2026, or approved community resource development plans pursuant to Section 4418.25
 as follows:

(1) For an adult who is identified by a regional center as an adult who could benefit from placement in an ARFPSHN.

(2) For a child who is identified by a regional center as a child who could benefit from placement in a GHCSHN.

(c) (1) Each ARFPSHN shall possess a community care facility license issued pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 1567.50) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. Until the Department of Social Services creates a stand-alone chapter for ARFPSHNs, each ARFPSHN shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 80000) of Division 6 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, except for Article 8 (commencing with Section 80090).

(2) Each GHCSHN shall possess a community care facility license issued pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 1567.50) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and shall be subject to the requirements of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 80000) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 84000) of Division 6 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, except that Article 8 (commencing with Section 80090) of Chapter 1 of Division 6 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations shall not apply.

(d) For purposes of this article, a health facility licensed pursuant to subdivision (e) or (h) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code may place its licensed bed capacity in voluntary suspension for the purpose of licensing the facility to operate an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN if the facility is selected to participate pursuant to Section 4684.58. Consistent with subdivision (a) of Section 4684.50, any facility
 licensed pursuant to this section shall serve up to five adults or up to five children. A facility’s bed capacity shall not be placed in voluntary suspension until all consumers residing in the facility under the license to be suspended have been relocated. A consumer shall not be relocated unless it is reflected in the consumer’s individual program plan developed pursuant to Sections 4646 and 4646.5.

(e) Each ARFPSHN and each GHCSHN are subject to the requirements of Subchapters 5 to 9, inclusive, of Chapter 1 of, and Subchapters 2 and 4 of Chapter 3 of, Division 2 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) Each ARFPSHN and each GHCSHN shall ensure that an operable automatic fire sprinkler system is installed and maintained.

(g) Each ARFPSHN and each GHCSHN shall have an operable automatic fire sprinkler
 system that is approved by the State Fire Marshal and that meets the National Fire Protection Association (NFPA) 13D standard for the installation of sprinkler systems in single- and two-family dwellings and manufactured homes. A local jurisdiction shall not require a sprinkler system exceeding this standard by amending the standard or by applying standards other than NFPA 13D. A public water agency shall not interpret this section as changing the status of a facility from a residence entitled to residential water rates, nor shall a new meter or larger connection pipe be required of the facility.

(h) Each ARFPSHN and each GHCSHN shall provide an alternative power source to operate all functions of the facility for a minimum of six hours in the event the primary power source is interrupted. The alternative power source shall comply with the manufacturer’s recommendations for installation and operation. The alternative power source shall be
 maintained in safe operating condition, and shall be tested every 14 days, or as per the manufacturer’s recommended schedule, under the full load condition for a minimum of 10 minutes. Written records of inspection, performance, exercising period, and repair of the alternative power source shall be regularly maintained on the premises and available for inspection by the State Department of Developmental Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 11.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.55.

(a) A regional center may not pay a rate to an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN for a consumer that exceeds the rate in the State Department of Developmental Services’ rate model for those homes unless the regional center demonstrates that a higher rate is necessary to protect a consumer’s health and safety, and the department has granted prior written authorization.

(b) The established rate for a full month of service shall be made by the regional center if a consumer is temporarily absent from the ARFPSHN or from the GHCSHN for 14 days or less per month. If the consumer’s temporary absence is due to the need for inpatient care in a health facility, as defined in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, the regional center shall continue to pay the established rate as long as no other consumer occupies the vacancy created by the consumer’s temporary absence, or until the individual health care plan team has determined that the consumer will not return to the facility. In all other cases, the established rate shall be prorated for a partial month of service by dividing the established rate by 30.44 then by multiplying the quotient by the number of days the consumer
 resided in the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 12.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.58.

(a) The regional center may recommend for participation, to the State Department of Developmental Services, an applicant to provide services as part of an approved community placement plan pursuant to former Section 4418.25, as that section read on June 30, 2026, or an approved community resource development plan pursuant to Section 4418.25, if the applicant meets all of the following requirements:

(1) The applicant employs or contracts with a program administrator who has a successful record of administering residential services for at least two years, as evidenced by substantial compliance with the applicable state licensing requirements.

(2) The applicant prepares and submits, to the regional center, a complete facility program plan that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The total number of the consumers to be served.

(B) A profile of the consumer population to be served, including their health care and intensive support needs.

(C) A description of the program components, including a description of the health care and intensive support services to be provided.

(D) A week’s program schedule, including proposed consumer day and community integration activities.

(E) A week’s proposed program staffing pattern, including licensed, unlicensed,
 and support personnel and the number and distribution of hours for such personnel.

(F) An organizational chart, including identification of lead and supervisory personnel.

(G) The consultants to be utilized, including their professional disciplines and hours to be worked per week or month, as appropriate.

(H) The plan for accessing and retaining consultant and health care services, including assessments, in the areas of physical therapy, occupational therapy, respiratory therapy, speech pathology, audiology, pharmacy, dietary/nutrition, dental, and other areas required for meeting the needs identified in consumers’ individual health care plans.

(I) A description, including the size, layout, location, and condition of the proposed home.

(J) A description of the equipment and supplies available, or to be obtained, for programming and care.

(K) The type, location, and response time of emergency medical service personnel.

(L) The in-service training program plan for at least the next 12 months, that shall include the plan for ensuring that the direct care personnel understands their roles and responsibilities related to implementing individual health care plans, prior to, or within, the first seven days of providing direct care in the home and for ensuring the administrator understands the unique roles, responsibilities, and expectations for administrators of community-based facilities.

(M) The plan for ensuring that outside services are coordinated, integrated, and consistent with those
 provided by the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN.

(N) Written certification that an alternative power system required by subdivision (h) of Section 4684.53 meets the manufacturer’s recommendations for installation and operation.

(3) Submits a proposed budget and rate model worksheet.

(4) The applicant submits written certification that they have the ability to comply with all of the requirements of Section 1520 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The regional center shall provide all documentation
 specified in paragraphs (2) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) and a letter recommending program certification to the State Department of Developmental Services.

(c) The State Department of Developmental Services shall either approve or deny the recommendation and transmit its written decision to the regional center and to the State Department of Social Services within 30 days of its decision. The decision of the State Department of Developmental Services not to approve an application for program certification shall be the final administrative decision.

(d) Any change in the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN operation that alters the contents of the approved program plan shall be reported to the State Department of Developmental Services and the contracting regional center, and approved by both agencies, prior to implementation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 253, Sec. 13.   (AB 175)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4684.60.

The vendoring regional center shall, before placing a consumer into an ARFPSHN or a GHCSHN, ensure that the ARFPSHN or the GHCSHN has a license issued by the State Department of Social Services for not more than five adults, in the case of an ARFPSHN, or not more than five children, in the case of a GHCSHN, and a contract with the regional center that includes, at a minimum, all of the following:
